Washington statutes.
RCW 15.36.561

Dairy inspection program—Advisory committee—Purpose—Terms.

(1) There is created a dairy inspection program advisory committee. The committee shall consist of eleven members appointed by the director. The director shall solicit nominations for members of the committee from Washington dairy producer organizations and milk processors. The committee shall consist of four members who are producers or their representatives, four members who are milk processors or their representatives, one member who is a producer processor, one member who is a milk hauler, and one member who is a milk equipment dealer.

(2) The purpose of this advisory committee is to advise the director in the administration of the dairy inspection program and regarding policy issues related to this chapter.

(3) The terms of the members of the committee shall be staggered and the members shall serve a term of three years until their successor has been appointed and qualified. In the event a committee member resigns, is disqualified, or vacates a position on the committee for any reason the vacancy may be filled by the director under the provisions of this section governing appointments. The director may remove a member for cause.

(4) The committee shall elect one of its members as chair. The committee shall meet by the call of the director, chair, or a majority of the committee. Members of the committee shall serve without compensation.

[ 1999 c 291 s 27; 1994 c 143 s 507; 1994 c 34 s 2; 1992 c 160 s 2. Formerly RCW 15.36.107.]